District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.08

Operator deemed to be agent of owner.

Whenever any motor vehicle, after the passage of this chapter, shall be operated upon the public highways of the District of Columbia by any person other than the owner, with the consent of the owner, express or implied, the operator thereof shall in case of accident, be deemed to be the agent of the owner of such motor vehicle, and the proof of the ownership of said motor vehicle shall be prima facie evidence that such person operated said motor vehicle with the consent of the owner.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 123, ch. 222, § 8

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-408.
1973 Ed., § 40-424.